scripts/procl_se.script
#***** procl_se.script *****
# Th. Fransen, 20/08/19
# Combine variables derived from proclitic.lexc (proclitic.script) and se.lexc (se_3_mut.script)

echo >>> Opening 'procl_se.script' ...

clear stack

#\\\\\ DEFINE UNFILTERED LEXICON /////

echo >>> Concatenating variables 'LEXprocl' · 'LEXseConjWithMut' ...
define LEXunfiltered [LEXprocl "+PROCL_JUNCT":· LEXseConjWithMut ] ;

#\\\\\ APPLY UPPER-LEVEL FILTER RULES /////

source procl_se_filter_1_aug.rule	
define proclSEfilter1 ;

source procl_se_filter_2_no.rule	
define proclSEfilter2 ;

source procl_se_filter_3_ipv.rule	
define proclSEfilter3 ;

source procl_se_filter_4_pass.rule	
define proclSEfilter4 ;

source procl_se_filter_5_sv.rule	
define proclSEfilter5 ;

source procl_se_filter_6_mut.rule
define proclSEfilter6 ;

define proclSEfilters [proclSEfilter1 .o. proclSEfilter2 .o. proclSEfilter3 .o. proclSEfilter4 .o. proclSEfilter5 .o. proclSEfilter6 ] ;

echo >>> Filtering ...
define LEXfilteredTemp1 [proclSEfilters .o. LEXunfiltered] ;

echo >>> More filtering and defining intermediate lexicons ...
# Intermediate lexicons: LEXfilteredTemp2-15
source procl_se_filter_7_emph.rule
push LEXfilteredTemp15

define LEXproclSElegal

#\\\\\ DELETE PROCLITIC MUTATION TAGS /////

set flag-is-epsilon ON

echo >>> Deleting mirroring mutation tags before +PROCL_JUNCT ...
# invert lexicon as replace rules target lower level, invert afterwards
regex [
LEXproclSElegal.i .o. 
["+NAS" -> 0 || _ "+PROCL_JUNCT" "+NAS"] .o.
["+LEN" -> 0 || _ "+PROCL_JUNCT" "+LEN"] .o.
["+H" -> 0 || _ "+PROCL_JUNCT" "+H"]
].i ; 

set flag-is-epsilon OFF

#\\\\\ DEFINE FINAL LEXICON AS VARIABLE /////

echo >>> Defining final lexicon ...
define LEXproclSE
